Kentucky, session 2026RS, HB892.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
Section 1. KRS 45A.100 is amended to read as follows:
(1) Procurements may be made in accordance with small purchase administrative
regulations promulgated by the secretary of the Finance and Administration
Cabinet, in accordance with[pursuant to] KRS Chapter 13A, as follows:
(a) Up to fifty[ten] thousand dollars ($50,000)[($10,000)] per project for
construction and seven thousand five hundred[one thousand] dollars
($7,500)[($1,000)] for purchases by any state governmental body, except for
those state administrative bodies specified in paragraph (b) of this subsection;
and
(b) Up to one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) per project for construction or
purchases by the Finance and Administration Cabinet, state institutions of
higher education, and the legislative branch of government.
(2) Procurement requirements shall not be artificially divided so as to constitute a small
purchase under this section. Reverse auctions may be used for small purchase
procurements. At least every two (2) years, the secretary shall review the prevailing
costs of labor and materials and shall[may] make recommendations to the next
regular session of the General Assembly for the revision of the[ then current]
maximum small purchase amounts in subsection (1) of this section[amount] as
justified by intervening changes in the cost of labor and materials.
(3) The secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet may grant to any state
agency with a justifiable need a delegation of small purchasing authority which
exceeds the agency's small purchase limit provided in subsection (1) of this section.
Delegations of small purchasing authority shall be granted or revoked by the
secretary of the Finance and Administration Cabinet, in accordance with
administrative regulations promulgated by the cabinet in accordance with[pursuant
Page 1 of 2
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:21 PM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 38
to] KRS Chapter 13A. These administrative regulations shall establish, at a
minimum, the criteria for granting and revoking delegations of small purchasing
authority, including the requesting agency's past compliance with purchasing
regulations, the level of training of the agency's purchasing staff, and the extent to
which the agency utilizes the Kentucky Automated Purchasing System. The
administrative regulations may permit the secretary of the Finance and
Administration Cabinet to delegate small purchase procurements up to the
maximum amount specified in subsection (1)(b) of this section.
Page 2 of 2
XXXX 3/3/2026 3:21 PM Jacketed